North Carolina statutes. Chapter 104E. North Carolina Radiation Protection Act.
§ 104E-1.
Title.

This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Radiation Protection Act.”

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter is Chapter 104C as rewritten by Session Laws 1975, c. 718, s. 1, effective July 1, 1975, and recodified. Session Laws 1975, c. 718, s. 8, provided that s. 1 of the act would expire June 30, 1981. Session Laws 1975, c. 718, s. 8, was amended by Session Laws 1981, c. 393, so as to delete the provision for expiration of the act.

The provision of Session Laws 1977, c. 712, as amended, tentatively repealing this Chapter effective July 1, 1983, was itself repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 932, s. 1.

Session Laws 1987, c. 850, which amended many of the sections of this Chapter, provided in s. 27(a) that c. 850 would not be construed as a revenue bill within the meaning of N.C. Const., Art. II, § 23. However, Session Laws 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 993, s. 23, repealed Session Laws 1987, c. 850, s. 27(a).

§ 104E-2.
Scope.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, this Chapter applies to all persons who receive, possess, use, transfer, own or acquire any source of radiation within the State of North Carolina; provided, however, that nothing in this Chapter shall apply to any person to the extent such person is subject to regulation by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission or its successors.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

§ 104E-3.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the State of North Carolina in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the public health and safety:

To institute and maintain a program to permit development and utilization of sources of radiation for purposes consistent with the health and safety of the public; and

To prevent any associated harmful effects of radiation upon the public through the institution and maintenance of a regulatory program for all sources of radiation, providing for:

A single, effective system of regulation within the State;

A system consonant insofar as possible with those of other states; and

Compatibility with the standards and regulatory programs of the federal government for by-product, source and special nuclear materials.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

§ 104E-4.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this Chapter to effectuate the policies set forth in

G.S. 104E-3

by providing for:

A program of effective regulation of sources of radiation for the protection of the occupational and public health and safety;

A program to promote an orderly regulatory pattern within the State, among the states and between the federal government and the State and facilitate intergovernmental cooperation with respect to use and regulation of sources of radiation to the end that duplication of regulation may be minimized; and

A program to establish procedures for assumption and performance of certain regulatory responsibilities with respect to sources of radiation.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

§ 104E-5.
Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following terms as used in this Chapter shall have the meanings hereinafter respectively ascribed to them:

“Agreement materials” means those materials licensed by the State under agreement with the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission and which include by-product, source or special nuclear materials in a quantity not sufficient to form a critical mass, as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 as amended.

“Agreement state” means any state which has consummated an agreement with the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission under the authority of section 274 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 as amended, as authorized by compatible state legislation providing for acceptance by that state of licensing authority for agreement materials and the discontinuance of such licensing activities by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

“Atomic energy” means all forms of energy released in the course of nuclear fission or nuclear fusion or other atomic transformations.

“By-product material” means any radioactive material, except special nuclear material, yielded in or made radioactive by exposure to the radiation incident to the process of producing or utilizing special nuclear material.

“Commission” means the Radiation Protection Commission.

“Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services.

“Emergency” means any condition existing outside the bounds of nuclear operating sites owned or licensed by a federal agency, and further any condition existing within or outside of the jurisdictional confines of a facility licensed by the Department and arising from the presence of by-product material, source material, special nuclear materials, or other radioactive materials, which is endangering or could reasonably be expected to endanger the health and safety of the public, or to contaminate the environment.

(7a)

“Engineered barrier” means a man-made structure or device that is intended to improve a disposal facility’s ability to meet (i) the performance objectives of Subpart C, Title 10, Code of Federal Regulations Part 61 in effect on 1 January 1987, (ii) other requirements set out in

G.S. 104E-25

, and (iii) requirements of rules adopted by the Commission under this Chapter.

“General license” means a license effective pursuant to regulations promulgated under the provisions of this Chapter without the filing of an application to transfer, acquire, own, possess, or use quantities of, or devices or equipment utilizing by-product, source, special nuclear materials, or other radioactive materials occurring naturally or produced artificially.

“Ionizing radiation” means gamma rays and x-rays, alpha and beta particles, high speed electrons, protons, neutrons, and other nuclear particles; but not sound or radio waves, or visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light.

(9a)

“Low-level radioactive waste” means low-level radioactive waste as defined in the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Policy Amendments Act of 1985, Pub. L. 99-240, 99 Stat. 1842, 42 U.S.C. 2021b et seq. and other waste, including waste containing naturally occurring and accelerator produced radioactive material, which is not regulated by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission or other agency of the federal government and which is determined to be low-level radioactive waste by the North Carolina Radiation Protection Commission.

(9b)

“Low-level radioactive waste facility” means a facility for the storage, collection, processing, treatment, recycling, recovery, or disposal of low-level radioactive waste.

(9c)

“Low-level radioactive waste disposal facility” means any low-level radioactive waste facility or any portion of such facility, including land, buildings, and equipment, which is used or intended to be used for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste on or in land in accordance with rules promulgated under this Chapter.

“Nonionizing radiation” means radiation in any portion of the electromagnetic spectrum not defined as ionizing radiation, including, but not limited to, such sources as laser, maser or microwave devices.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, firm, association, trust, estate, public or private institution, group, agency, political subdivision of this State, any other state or political subdivision or agency thereof, and any legal successor, representative, agent, or agency of the foregoing, other than the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, and other than federal government agencies licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto.

“Radiation” means gamma rays and x-rays, alpha and beta particles, high speed electrons, protons, neutrons, and other nuclear particles, and electromagnetic radiation consisting of associated and interacting electric and magnetic waves including those with frequencies between three times 10 to the eighth power cycles per second and three times 10 to the twenty-fourth power cycles per second and wavelengths between one times 10 to the minus fourteenth power centimeters and 100 centimeters.

“Radiation machine” means any device designed to produce or which produces radiation or nuclear particles when the associated control devices of the machine are operated.

“Radioactive material” means any solid, liquid, or gas which emits ionizing radiation spontaneously.

(14a)

“Shallow land burial” means disposal of low-level radioactive waste in subsurface trenches without the additional confinement of the waste as described in

G.S. 104E-25

.

(14b)

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

“Source material” means (i) uranium, thorium, or any other material which the Department declares to be source material after the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto has determined the material to be such; or (ii) ores containing one or more of the foregoing materials, in such concentration as the Department declares to be source material after the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, has determined the material in such concentration to be source material.

“Special nuclear material” means (i) plutonium, uranium 233, uranium 235, uranium enriched in the isotope 233 or in the isotope 235, and any other material which the Department declares to be special nuclear material after the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, has determined the material to be such, but does not include source material; or (ii) any material artificially enriched by any of the foregoing, but does not include source material.

“Specific license” means a license, issued after application, to use, manufacture, produce, transfer, receive, acquire, own or process quantities of, or devices or equipment utilizing by-product, source, special nuclear materials, or other radioactive materials occurring naturally or produced artificially. Nothing in this Chapter shall require the licensing of individual natural persons involved in the use of radiation machines or radioactive materials for medical diagnosis or treatment.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 850, s. 3.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 8; 1987, c. 633, ss. 1-4; c. 850, s. 3; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(16); 1993, c. 501, s. 2.1; 1995, c. 504, s. 4; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.3(ccc); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2015-264, s. 54(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(ccc), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Department of Health and Human Services” for “State Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (6).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (14b).

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 54(a), effective October 1, 2015, substituted “Health and Human Services” for “Environmental Quality” in subdivision (14b).

§ 104E-6.
Designation of State radiation protection agency.

The Department is hereby designated the State agency to administer a statewide radiation protection program consistent with the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

§ 104E-6.1.
Conveyance of land used for low-level radioactive waste disposal facility to State.

No land may be used as a low-level radioactive waste disposal facility until fee simple title to the land has been conveyed to the State of North Carolina. In consideration for such conveyance, the State shall enter into a lease agreement with the grantor for a term equal to the estimated life of the facility in which the State will be the lessor and the grantor the lessee. Such lease agreement shall specify that for an annual rent of fifty dollars ($50.00), the lessee shall be allowed to use the land for the development and operation of a low-level radioactive waste disposal facility. Such lease agreement shall provide that the lessor or any person authorized by the lessor shall have at all times the right to enter without a search warrant or permission of the lessee upon any and all parts of the premises for monitoring, inspection and all other purposes necessary to carry out the provisions of Chapter 104E. The lessee shall remain fully liable for all damages, losses, personal injury or property damage which may result or arise out of the lessee’s operation of the facility, and for compliance with regulatory requirements concerning insurance, bonding for closure and post-closure costs, monitoring and other financial or health and safety requirements as required by applicable law and regulations. The State, as lessor, shall be immune from liability except as otherwise provided by statute. The lease shall be transferrable with the written consent of the lessor, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld. In the case of such a transfer of the lease, the transferee shall be subject to all terms and conditions that the State deems necessary to ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations. If the lessee or any successor in interest fails in any material respect to comply with any applicable law, regulation, or license condition, or with any term or condition of the lease, the State may terminate the lease after giving the lessee written notice specifically describing the failure to comply and upon providing the lessee a reasonable time to comply. If the lessee does not effect compliance within the reasonable time allowed, the State may reenter and take possession of the premises.

Notwithstanding the termination of the lease by either the lessee or the lessor for any reason, the lessee shall remain liable for, and be obligated to perform all acts necessary or required by law, regulation, license conditions or the lease for the permanent closure of the site until the site has either been permanently closed or until a substitute operator has been secured and assumed the obligations of the lessee.

In the event of changes in laws or regulations applicable to the facility which make continued operation by the lessee impossible or economically infeasible, the lessee shall have the right to terminate the lease upon giving the State reasonable notice of not less than six months, in which case the lessor shall have the right to secure a substitute lessee and operator.

In the event of termination of the lease by the lessor as provided in subsection (a) of this section, or by the lessee as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the lessee shall be paid the fair market value of any improvements made to the leased premises less the costs to the lessor resulting from termination of the lease and securing a substituted lessee and operator; provided, that the lessor shall have no obligation to secure a substitute lessee or operator and may require the lessee to permanently close the facility.

History.

1981, c. 704, s. 9; 1987, c. 633, s. 5; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 5; 2007-495, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-495, s. 9, effective August 30, 2007, substituted “license” for “permit” preceding “condition(s)” in subsections (a) and (b).

§ 104E-6.2.
Local ordinances prohibiting low-level radioactive waste facilities invalid; petition to preempt local ordinance.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to maintain a uniform system for the management of low-level radioactive waste and to place limitations upon the exercise by all units of local government in North Carolina of the power to regulate the management of low-level radioactive waste by means of special, local, or private acts or resolutions, ordinances, property restrictions, zoning regulations, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any authority granted to counties, municipalities, or other local authorities to adopt local ordinances, including but not limited to those imposing taxes, fees, or charges or regulating health, environment, or land use, any local ordinance that prohibits or has the effect of prohibiting the establishment or operation of a low-level radioactive waste facility that the Secretary has preempted pursuant to subsections (b) through (f) of this section, shall be invalid to the extent necessary to effectuate the purposes of this Chapter. To this end, all provisions of special, local, or private acts or resolutions are repealed that:

Prohibit the transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of low-level radioactive waste within any county, city, or other political subdivision.

Prohibit the siting of a low-level radioactive waste facility within any county, city, or other political subdivision.

Place any restriction or condition not placed by this Chapter upon the transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of low-level radioactive waste, or upon the siting of a low-level radioactive waste facility within any county, city, or other political subdivision.

In any manner are in conflict or inconsistent with the provisions of this Chapter.

(a1)

No special, local, or private acts or resolutions enacted or taking effect hereafter may be construed to modify, amend, or repeal any portion of this Chapter unless it expressly provides for such by specific references to the appropriate section of this Chapter. Further to this end, all provisions of local ordinances, including those regulating land use, adopted by counties, municipalities, or other local authorities that prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the establishment or operation of a low-level radioactive waste facility are invalidated to the extent preempted by the Secretary pursuant to this Section.

When a low-level radioactive waste facility would be prevented from construction or operation by a county, municipal, or other local ordinance, the operator of the proposed facility may petition the Secretary to review the matter. After receipt of a petition, the Secretary shall hold a hearing in accordance with the procedures in subsection (c) of this section and shall determine whether or to what extent to preempt the local ordinance to allow for the establishment and operation of the facility.

When a petition described in subsection (b) of this section has been filed with the Secretary, the Secretary shall hold a public hearing to consider the petition. The public hearing shall be held in the affected locality within 60 days after receipt of the petition by the Secretary. The Secretary shall give notice of the public hearing by:

Publication in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the county or counties where the facility is or is to be located or operated, once a week for three consecutive weeks, the first notice appearing at least 30 days prior to the scheduled date of the hearing; and

First class mail to persons who have requested notice. The Secretary shall maintain a mailing list of persons who request notice in advance of the hearing pursuant to this section. Notice by mail shall be complete upon deposit of a copy of the notice in a post-paid wrapper addressed to the person to be notified at the address that appears on the mailing list maintained by the Secretary, in a post office or official depository under the exclusive care and custody of the United States Postal Service.

(c1)

Any interested person may appear before the Secretary at the hearing to offer testimony. In addition to testimony before the Secretary, any interested person may submit written evidence to the Secretary for the Secretary’s consideration. At least 20 days shall be allowed for receipt of written comment following the hearing.

The Secretary shall determine whether or to what extent to preempt local ordinances so as to allow the establishment and operation of the facility no later than 60 days after conclusion of the hearing. The Secretary shall preempt a local ordinance only if the Secretary makes all five of the following findings:

That there is a local ordinance that would prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the establishment or operation of a low-level radioactive waste facility.

That the proposed facility is needed in order to establish adequate capability to meet the current or projected low-level radioactive waste management needs of this State or to comply with the terms of any interstate agreement for the management of low-level radioactive waste to which the State is a party and therefore serves the interests of the citizens of the State as a whole.

That all legally required State and federal permits or approvals have been issued by the appropriate State and federal agencies or that all State and federal permit requirements have been satisfied and that the permits or approvals have been denied or withheld only because of the local ordinance.

That local citizens and elected officials have had adequate opportunity to participate in the siting process.

That the construction and operation of the facility will not pose an unreasonable health or environmental risk to the surrounding locality and that the facility operator has taken or consented to take reasonable measures to avoid or manage foreseeable risks and to comply to the maximum feasible extent with applicable local ordinances.

(d1)

If the Secretary does not make all five findings set out above, the Secretary shall not preempt the challenged local ordinance. The Secretary’s decision shall be in writing and shall identify the evidence submitted to the Secretary plus any additional evidence used in arriving at the decision.

The decision of the Secretary shall be final unless a party to the action files a written appeal under Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, as modified by

G.S. 7A-29

and this section, within 30 days of the date of the decision. The record on appeal shall consist of all materials and information submitted to or considered by the Secretary, the Secretary’s written decision, a complete transcript of the hearing, all written material presented to the Secretary regarding the location of the facility, the specific findings required by subsection (d) of this section, and any minority positions on the specific findings required by subsection (d) of this section. The scope of judicial review shall be that the court may affirm the decision of the Secretary, or may remand the matter for further proceedings, or may reverse or modify the decision if the substantial rights of the parties may have been prejudiced because the agency findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the agency;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Affected by other error of law;

Unsupported by substantial evidence admissible under G.S. 150B-29(a) or

G.S. 150B-30

in view of the entire record as submitted; or

Arbitrary or capricious.

(e1)

If the court reverses or modifies the decision of the agency, the judge shall set out in writing, which writing shall become part of the record, the reasons for the reversal or modification.

In computing any period of time prescribed or allowed by this procedure, the provisions of Rule 6(a) of the Rules of Civil Procedure,

G.S. 1A-1

, shall apply.

History.

1981, c. 704, s. 9; 1987, c. 633, s. 6; c. 850, s. 4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 993, s. 24; c. 1082, s. 10; c. 1100, s. 40.5; 1989, c. 168, s. 14; 1993, c. 501, s. 3; 2001-474, s. 16.

§ 104E-7.
Radiation Protection Commission — Creation and powers.

There is hereby created the North Carolina Radiation Protection Commission of the Department of Health and Human Services with the power to promulgate rules and regulations to be followed in the administration of a radiation protection program. All rules and regulations for radiation protection that were adopted by the Commission for Public Health and are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Chapter shall remain in full force and effect unless and until repealed or superseded by action of the Radiation Protection Commission. The Radiation Protection Commission is authorized:

To advise the Department in the development of comprehensive policies and programs for the evaluation, determination, and reduction of hazards associated with the use of radiation;

To adopt, promulgate, amend and repeal such rules, regulations and standards relating to the manufacture, production, transportation, use, handling, servicing, installation, storage, sale, lease, or other disposition of radioactive material and radiation machines as may be necessary to carry out the policy, purpose and provisions of this Chapter. To this end, the Commission is authorized to require licensing or registration of all persons who manufacture, produce, transport, use, handle, service, install, store, sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of radioactive material and radiation machines, as the Commission deems necessary to provide an adequate protection and supervisory program: provided, that prior to adoption of any regulation or standard, or amendment or repeal thereof, the Commission shall afford interested parties the opportunity, at a public hearing, as provided in

G.S. 104E-13

, to submit data or views orally or in writing. The recommendations of nationally recognized bodies in the field of radiation protection shall be taken into consideration in such standards relative to permissible dosage of radiation;

To require all sources of ionizing radiation to be shielded, transported, handled, used, stored, or disposed of in such a manner to provide compliance with the provisions of this Chapter and rules, regulations and standards adopted hereunder;

To require, on prescribed forms furnished by the Department, registration, periodic reregistration, licensing, or periodic relicensing of persons to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, install, service, receive, acquire, own, or possess radiation machines and other sources of radiation;

To exempt certain sources of radiation or kinds of uses or users from the licensing or registration requirements set forth in this Chapter when the Commission determines that the exemption of such sources of radiation or kinds of uses or users will not constitute a significant risk to the health and safety of the public;

To promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to this Chapter which may provide for recognition of other state and federal licenses as the Commission shall deem desirable, subject to such registration requirements as it may prescribe; and exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter;

To provide by rule and regulation for an electronic product safety program to protect the public health and safety, which program may authorize regulation and inspection of sources of nonionizing radiation throughout the State. The product safety program may include the establishment of minimum qualifications for the operators of these products or sources.

To adopt, amend, repeal or promulgate such rules, regulations, and standards relating to the nonradioactive, toxic and hazardous aspects of radioactive waste disposal, as may be necessary to protect the public health and safety.

To adopt regulations establishing financial responsibility requirements for maintenance, operation and long-term care of low-level radioactive waste facilities, including insurance during the operation of the facility and adequate assurance of availability of funds for facility closure and post-closure monitoring and corrective measures.

To adopt rules which exempt a generator of low-level radioactive waste who operates a low-level radioactive waste facility solely for the management of wastes he produces, from any requirement, made applicable by this Chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this Chapter to low-level radioactive waste facilities generally where, because of the low volume or activity of the wastes involved, such exemption would not endanger the public health or safety, or the environment.

No license for a low-level radioactive waste facility that would accept low-level radioactive waste from the public, or from another person for a fee, shall be issued other than for a facility authorized by the General Assembly.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1979, c. 694, s. 3; 1981, c. 704, s. 10; 1987, c. 850, s. 5; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(17); 1991, c. 735, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2001-474, s. 2; 2007-182, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2015-264, s. 54(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in the first sentence of the introductory language of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 54(b), effective October 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Health and Human Services” for “Department of Environmental Quality” in the first sentence of the introductory language of subsection (a).

§ 104E-8.
Radiation Protection Commission — Members; selections; removal; compensation; quorum; services.

The Commission shall consist of 11 voting public members and 10 nonvoting ex officio members. The 11 voting public members of the Commission shall be appointed by the Governor as follows:

One member who shall be actively involved in the field of environmental protection;

One member who shall be an employee of one of the licensed public utilities involved in the generation of power by atomic energy;

One member who shall have experience in the field of atomic energy other than power generation;

One member who shall be a scientist or engineer from the faculty of one of the institutions of higher learning in the State;

One member who shall have recognized knowledge in the field of radiation and its biological effects from the North Carolina Medical Society;

One member who shall have recognized knowledge in the field of radiation and its biological effects from the North Carolina Dental Society;

One member who shall have recognized knowledge in the field of radiation and its biological effects from the State at large;

One member who shall have recognized knowledge in the field of radiation and its biological effects and who shall be a practicing hospital administrator from the North Carolina Hospital Association;

One member who shall have recognized knowledge in the field of radiation and its biological effects from the North Carolina Chiropractic Association;

One member who shall have recognized knowledge in the clinical application of radiation, shall be a practicing radiologic technologist from the North Carolina Society of Radiologic Technologists, and shall be certified by the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists;

One member who shall have recognized knowledge in the clinical application of radiation and shall be a practicing podiatrist licensed by the North Carolina State Board of Podiatry Examiners.

Public members so appointed shall serve terms of office of four years. Four of the initial members shall be appointed for two years, three members for three years, and three members for four years. Any appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, dismissal, death or disability of a public member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term. At the expiration of each public member’s term, the Governor shall reappoint or replace the member with a member of like qualifications. At its first meeting on or after July first of each year, the Commission shall designate by election one of its public members as chairman and one of its public members as vice-chairman to serve through June thirtieth of the following year.

The 10 ex officio members shall be appointed by the Governor, shall be members or employees of the following State agencies or their successors, and shall serve at the Governor’s pleasure:

The Utilities Commission.

The Commission for Public Health.

The Environmental Management Commission.

The Board of Transportation.

The Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Public Safety.

The Division of Health Service Regulation of the Department.

The Department of Labor.

The Industrial Commission.

The Department of Insurance.

The Medical Care Commission.

The Governor shall have the power to remove any member from the Commission for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in accordance with G.S. 143B-13.

The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

A majority of the public members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(18); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, ss. 19(b), 41; 1991, c. 342, ss. 2, 3; 2002-70, s. 2; 2007-182, s. 2; 2011-145, ss. 13.3(ddd), 19.1(g); 2011-391, s. 27(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in subdivision (c)(2).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(ddd), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Division of Health Safety Regulation” for “Division of Environmental Health” in subdivision (c)(6).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety” in subdivision (c)(5).

Session Laws 2011-391, s. 27(c), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Service” for “Safety” in subdivision (c)(6).

§ 104E-9.
Powers and functions of Department of Health and Human Services.

The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized:

To advise, consult and cooperate with other public agencies and with affected groups and industries.

To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, public hearings, training, research, and demonstrations relating to the control of sources of radiation, the measurement of radiation, the effect upon public health and safety of exposure to radiation and related problems.

To require the submission of plans, specifications, and reports for new construction and material alterations on (i) the design and protective shielding of installations for radioactive material and radiation machines and (ii) systems for the disposal of radioactive waste materials, for the determination of any radiation hazard and may render opinions, approve or disapprove such plans and specifications.

To collect and disseminate information relating to the sources of radiation, including but not limited to: (i) maintenance of a record of all license applications, issuances, denials, amendments, transfers, renewals, modifications, suspensions, and revocations; and (ii) maintenance of a record of registrants and licensees possessing sources of radiation requiring registration or licensure under the provisions of this Chapter, and regulations hereunder, and any administrative or judicial action pertaining thereto; and to develop and implement a responsible data management program for the purpose of collecting and analyzing statistical information necessary to protect the public health and safety. The Department may refuse to make public dissemination of information relating to the source of radiation within this State after the Department first determines that the disclosure of such information will contravene the stated policy and purposes of this Chapter and such disclosure would be against the health, welfare and safety of the public.

To respond to any emergency which involves possible or actual release of radioactive material; and to perform or supervise decontamination and otherwise protect the public health and safety in any manner deemed necessary. This section does not in any way alter or change the provisions of Chapter 166 of the North Carolina General Statutes concerning response during an emergency by the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs or its successor.

To develop and maintain a statewide environmental radiation program for monitoring the radioactivity levels in air, water, soil, vegetation, animal life, milk, and food as necessary to ensure protection of the public and the environment from radiation hazards.

To implement the provisions of this Chapter and the regulations duly promulgated under the Chapter.

To establish fees in accordance with

G.S. 104E-19

.

To enter upon any lands and structures upon lands to make surveys, borings, soundings, and examinations as may be necessary to determine the suitability of a site for a low-level radioactive waste facility or low-level radioactive disposal facility. The Department shall give 30 days’ notice of the intended entry authorized by this section in the manner prescribed for service of process by

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4. Entry under this section shall not be deemed a trespass or taking; provided, however, that the Department shall make reimbursement for any damage to such land or structures caused by such activities.

To encourage research and development and disseminate information on state-of-the-art means of handling and disposing of low-level radioactive waste.

To promote public education and public involvement in the decision-making process for the siting and permitting of proposed low-level radioactive waste facilities. The Department shall assist localities in which facilities are proposed in collecting and receiving information relating to the suitability of the proposed site. At the request of a local government in which facilities are proposed, the Department shall direct the appropriate agencies of State government to develop such relevant data as that locality shall reasonably request.

The Division of Health Service Regulation of the Department shall develop a training program for tanning equipment operators that meets the training rules adopted by the Commission. If the training program is provided by the Department, the Department may charge each person trained a reasonable fee to recover the actual cost of the training program.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1979, c. 694, s. 4; 1981, c. 704, s. 10.1; 1987, c. 633, s. 7; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 993, s. 25; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(19); 1991, c. 735, s. 2; 1993, c. 501, s. 4; 1995, c. 509, s. 49; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2001-474, s. 3; 2002-70, s. 3; 2009-451, s. 13.3(b); 2011-145, s. 13.3(eee); 2011-391, s. 27(d).

Editor’s Note.

Chapter 166, referred to in subdivision (a)(5), was repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 848, s. 1. See now

G.S. 166A-1

et seq.

The text of this section, as it read subsequent to its amendment by Session Laws 1989, c. 727, s. 219(19), was designated as subsection (a), and the first and last sentences of Session Laws 1991, c. 735, s. 2 were codified as subsection (b), at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 13.3(b), effective August 7, 2009, rewrote subdivision (a)(8).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(eee), effective July 1, 2011, in the section catchline and in subsection (a), substituted “Department of Health and Human Services” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources”; and in subsection (b), substituted “Division of Health Safety Regulation” for “Division of Environmental Health.”

Session Laws 2011-391, s. 27(d), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Service” for “Safety” in subsection (b).